zh-TW: 紀念幣鑄幣廠標記: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; 無造幣廠標記; O; P; S; SF; W; 其他
es: Marca de ceca de la moneda conmemorativa: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Sin marca de ceca; O; P; S; SF; W; Otro
hu: Emlékérme verdejele: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Nincs verdejel; O; P; S; SF; W; Egyéb
tr: Hatıra parası darphane işareti: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Darphane işareti yok; O; P; S; SF; W; Diğer
pt-BR: Marca da casa da moeda comemorativa: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Sem marca da casa da moeda; O; P; S; SF; W; Outro
lt-LT: Proginės monetos kalyklos ženklas: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Be kalyklos ženklo; O; P; S; SF; W; Kita
bg-BG: Монетен знак на възпоменателна монета: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Без знак на монетния двор; O; P; S; SF; W; Друго
fi: Rahapajan tunnus juhlarahassa: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Ei rahapajan tunnusta; O; P; S; SF; W; Muu
th: เครื่องหมายโรงกษาปณ์ของเหรียญที่ระลึก: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; ไม่มีเครื่องหมายโรงกษาปณ์; O; P; S; SF; W; อื่นๆ
en: Commemorative coin mint mark: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; No mint mark; O; P; S; SF; W; Other
el: Σήμα κοπής νομίσματος συλλεκτικού χαρακτήρα: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Χωρίς σήμα νομισματοκοπείου; O; P; S; SF; W; Άλλο
ja: 記念コインのミントマーク: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; ミントマークなし; O; P; S; SF; W; その他
da: Møntmærke på erindringsmønt: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Intet møntmærke; O; P; S; SF; W; Andet
nb: Minnemynt myntmerke: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Uten myntmerke; O; P; S; SF; W; Annet
pt-PT: Marca da cunhagem da moeda comemorativa: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Sem marca de cunhagem; O; P; S; SF; W; Outro
ru: Знак монетного двора памятной монетыЗнак монетного двора на монете (или его отсутствие).: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Без знака монетного двора; O; P; S; SF; W; Другое
zh-CN: 纪念币造币厂标记: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; 无造币厂标记; O; P; S; SF; W; 其他
hr-HR: Oznaka kovnice prigodnog kovanog novca: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Bez oznake kovnice; O; P; S; SF; W; Ostalo
sk-SK: Značka mincovne pamätných mincí: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Bez značky mincovne; O; P; S; SF; W; Iné
sv: Jubileumsmyntmärke: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Inget myntmärke; O; P; S; SF; W; Övrigt
cs: Značka mincovny pamětní mince: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Bez mincovní značky; O; P; S; SF; W; Ostatní
de: Münzzeichen der Gedenkmünze: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Ohne Münzzeichen; O; P; S; SF; W; Sonstige
ro-RO: Marcaj de turnare monedă comemorativă: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Fără marcaj de monetărie; O; P; S; SF; W; Altele
it: Marchio di zecca della moneta commemorativa: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Nessun segno di zecca; O; P; S; SF; W; Altro
nl: Herdenkingsmunt muntteken: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Geen muntteken; O; P; S; SF; W; Overige
vi: Dấu hiệu xưởng đúc đồng xu kỷ niệm: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Không có ký hiệu xưởng đúc; O; P; S; SF; W; Khác
pl: Znak mennicy monety okolicznościowej: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Brak znaku mennicy; O; P; S; SF; W; Inny
sl-SI: Oznaka kovnice spominskega kovanca: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Brez oznake kovnice; O; P; S; SF; W; Drugo
fr: Marque de l’atelier de frappe de la pièce commémorative: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; Aucune marque d’atelier; O; P; S; SF; W; Autre
ko: 기념 주화 민트 마크: A; B; C; CC; D; K; M; 민트 마크 없음; O; P; S; SF; W; 기타